Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 3

Custody and Care of Dependent Children

71-3-301. County legislative body binding out as apprentices.

The county legislative body may bind out as apprentices suitable orphan children, or the children of any person unable to provide for their support, until the age of eighteen (18) years.

Code 1858, § 1622 (deriv. Acts 1762, ch. 5, § 19; 1825, ch. 46, § 1); Shan., § 2706; mod. Code 1932, § 4822; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 162, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1501, 14-9-101.

71-3-302. Illegitimate children as apprentices.

The county legislative body may bind out illegitimate children in the same way as orphans, upon its satisfactorily appearing that the mother of such illegitimate children disregards their moral and mental culture, and either keeps or lives in a house of ill fame, and upon its further appearing that the condition of such children would be thereby bettered, although the mother may provide ordinary food and clothing for the mother's children.

Code 1858, § 1625; Shan., § 2708; Code 1932, § 4918; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1502, 14-9-102.

Law Reviews.

Child Support Enforcement Act of 1985 (Sarah Elizabeth Jones), 22 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1986).

71-3-303. Reimbursement for county support of illegitimates.

For the purpose of indemnifying the county against charges for the maintenance of illegitimate children, the father, if the father can be ascertained, is liable to proceedings as provided in title 36, chapter 2.

Code 1858, § 1623; Shan., § 2707; Code 1932, § 4917; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1503, 14-9-103.

71-3-304. Procedure for taking child from institution.

When any child has been placed in any institution organized for the purpose of maintaining, supporting, and educating orphans or destitute children, with the consent of its parents, guardian, or custodian, no parent, guardian, or other person shall have the right to take the child from the institution against the consent of the institution or those in charge of the institution, except by habeas corpus proceedings, in which it shall appear that it is in the best interest of the child to take it from the institution.

This section shall apply to all institutions, whether corporations or mere voluntary societies or associations.

Any person taking or attempting to take any child from any institution, in violation of this section, commits a Class A misdemeanor, and shall be fined or imprisoned or both, in the discretion of the court.

Acts 1911, ch. 2, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 4433a81-4433a83; Code 1932, §§ 4709-4711; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1504; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; T.C.A., §14-9-104.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Cross-References. Habeas corpus, title 29, ch. 21.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.